North Dakota statutes. TITLE 27 Judicial Branch of Government
CHAPTER 27-06 District Court Reporters and Bailiffs [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 243, § 1]

27-06-01.
District court reporter — Appointment, oath, substitutes, qualifications. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 243, § 1.

27-06-02.
Salary and expenses of court reporter. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 243, § 1.

27-06-03.
Duties of district court reporter. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 243, § 1.

27-06-04.
Filing of shorthand notes taken by district court reporter. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 243, § 1.

27-06-05.
Transcript prepared by court reporter. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 243, § 1.

27-06-06.
Transcript in criminal action prepared at expense of state — Filing and use of transcript. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 243, § 1.

27-06-07.
Certification of transcript. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 243, § 1.

27-06-08.
Fees for transcripts. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 243, § 1.

27-06-09.
Bailiffs of district courts — Appointment — Salary. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 243, § 1.